Utah statutes.
53-7-106.   Adoption of state fire code.
(1) (a)  The state fire code is:
(i)  a code promulgated by a nationally recognized code authority that is
adopted by the Legislature under this section with any modifications; and
(ii)  a code to which cities, counties, fire protection districts, and the
state shall adhere in safeguarding life and property from the hazards of fire
and explosion.
(b)  On and after July 1, 2010, the state fire code is the state fire code in
effect on July 1, 2010, until in accordance with this section:
(i)  a new state fire code is adopted; or
(ii)  one or more provisions of the state fire code are amended or repealed in
accordance with this section.
(c)  A provision of the state fire code may be applicable:
(i)  to the entire state; or
(ii)  within a city, county, or fire protection district.
(2) (a)  The Legislature shall adopt a state fire code by enacting legislation
that adopts a nationally recognized fire code with any modifications.
(b)  Legislation enacted under this Subsection (2) shall state that it takes
effect on the July 1 after the day on which the legislation is enacted, unless
otherwise stated in the legislation.
(c)  Subject to Subsection (5), a state fire code adopted by the Legislature
is the state fire code until in accordance with this section the Legislature
adopts a new state fire code by:
(i)  adopting a new state fire code in its entirety; or
(ii)  amending or repealing one or more provisions of the state fire code.
(3) (a)  The board shall by no later than November 30 of each year recommend
to the Business and Labor Interim Committee whether the Legislature should:
(i)  amend or repeal one or more provisions of the state fire code; or
(ii)  in a year of a regularly scheduled update of a nationally recognized
fire code, adopt with any modifications the nationally recognized fire code.
(b)  The board may recommend legislative action related to the state fire
code:
(i)  on its own initiative; or
(ii)  upon the receipt of a request by a city, county, or fire protection
district that the board recommend legislative action related to the state fire
code.
(c)  Within 45 days after receipt of a request under Subsection (3)(b), the
board shall direct the division to convene an informal hearing concerning the
request.
(d)  The board shall conduct a hearing under this section in accordance with
the rules of the board.
(e)  The board shall decide whether to include in the report required under
Subsection (3)(a) whether to recommend the legislative action raised by a
request.
(f)  Within 15 days following the completion of a hearing of the board under
this Subsection (3), the board shall direct the division to notify the entity
that made the request of the board's decision regarding the request.  The
division shall provide the notice:
(i)  in writing; and
(ii)  in a form prescribed by the board.
(4)  If the Business and Labor Interim Committee decides to recommend
legislative action to the Legislature, the Business and Labor Interim
Committee shall prepare legislation for consideration by the Legislature in
the next general session that if passed by the Legislature would:
(a)  adopt a new state fire code in its entirety; or
(b)  amend or repeal one or more provisions of the state fire code.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), the board may, in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, amend a state fire
code if the board determines that waiting for legislative action in the next
general legislative session would:
(i)  cause an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare; or
(ii)  place a person in violation of federal or other state law.
(b)  If the board amends a state fire code in accordance with this Subsection
(5), the board shall:
(i)  publish the state fire code with the amendment; and
(ii)  notify the Business and Labor Interim Committee of the adoption,
including a copy of an analysis by the board identifying specific reasons and
justifications for its findings.
(c)  If not formally adopted by the Legislature at its next annual general
session, an amendment to a state fire code adopted under this Subsection (5)
is repealed on the July 1 immediately following the next annual general
session that follows the adoption of the amendment.
(6) (a)  A legislative body of a political subdivision may enact an ordinance
that is more restrictive in its fire code requirements than the state fire
code:
(i)  in order to meet a public safety need of the political subdivision; and
(ii)  subject to the requirements of this Subsection (6).
(b)  A legislative body of a political subdivision that enacts an ordinance
under this section on or after July 1, 2010 shall:
(i)  notify the board in writing at least 30 days before the day on which the
legislative body enacts the ordinance and include in the notice a statement as
to the proposed subject matter of the ordinance; and
(ii)  after the legislative body enacts the ordinance, report to the board
prior to the board making the report required under Subsection (6)(c),
including providing the board:
(A)  a copy of the ordinance enacted under this Subsection (6); and
(B)  a description of the public safety need that is the basis of enacting the
ordinance.
(c)  The board shall submit to the Business and Labor Interim Committee each
year with the recommendations submitted in accordance with Subsection (3):
(i)  a list of the ordinances enacted under this Subsection (6) during the
fiscal year immediately proceeding the report; and
(ii)  recommendations, if any, for legislative action related to an ordinance
enacted under this Subsection (6).
(d) (i)  The state fire marshal shall keep an indexed copy of an ordinance
enacted under this Subsection (6).
(ii)  The state fire marshal shall make a copy of an ordinance enacted under
this Subsection (6) available on request.
(e)  The board may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish procedures for a legislative body
of a political subdivision to follow to provide the notice and report required
under this Subsection (6).
